North Dakota, session 69, SB2068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 49-17.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-17.1-02. Department of transportation as designated state agency.
The department, with the approvalcooperation of the commission, is authorized to exercise those
powers necessary for the state to qualify for rail service assistance grants pursuant to provisions of the
Railroad Revitalization and Regulatory Reform Act of 1976 [Pub. L. 94-210; 90 Stat. 149; 49 U.S.C.
1651 et seq.], including authority to:
1. Prepare and recommend a state plan for all rail transportation and local rail services.
2. Administer and coordinate the state plan.
3. Provide in the plan for the equitable distribution of rail service assistance grants among state,
local, and regional transportation authorities.
4. Promote and support safe, adequate, and efficient rail services for those railway lines
receiving rail service assistance grants.
5. Employ sufficient trained and qualified personnel for these purposes.
6. Maintain adequate programs of investigation, research, promotion, and development in
connection with these purposes and to provide for public participation therein.
7. Provide satisfactory assurances on behalf of the state that fiscal control and fund accounting
procedures will be adopted by the state as may be necessary to assure proper disbursement
of an account for federal funds paid to the state as rail service assistance grants.
8. Comply with the regulations of the secretary of transportation of the United States department
of transportation affecting rail service assistance grants.
9. Do all things otherwise necessary to maximize federal assistance to the state under the
Railroad Revitalization and Regulatory Reform Act of 1976 [Pub. L. 94-210; 90 Stat. 149;
49 U.S.C. 1651 et seq.], and any amendments to it.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 49-17.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-17.1-03. Application for assistance.
The department, with the approval of the commission, may make application on behalf of the state
for grants made available by the secretary of transportation under the Railroad Revitalization and
Regulatory Reform Act of 1976 [Pub. L. 94-210; 90 Stat. 149; 49 U.S.C. 1651 et seq.].

S. B. NO. 2068 - PAGE 2
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 49-17.1-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-17.1-04. Use of public and private funds - Public service commission participation.
The department, with the approvalcooperation of the commission, may utilize public and private
funds appropriated by the legislative assembly in carrying out the purpose of this chapter. The
department shall cooperate with the commission and with other states in the reorganization or
reopening of any railway line which may have been abandoned by any railway corporation providing
railway services within the state. In carrying out the authority conferred by this section, the department
may enter into agreements, contracts, or other arrangements with the necessary parties to accomplish
the purposes of this chapter.

S. B. NO. 2068 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2068.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State